Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.900

Short title.

This chapter may be known and cited as the 2018 revised uniform law on notarial acts.

[ 2019 c 154 s 6; 2017 c 281 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 154: See note following RCW 42.45.280.